Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0669.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 512. (1) The director may authorize a person engaged in the production of a film in this state to use without charge property owned by or under the control of the department for the purpose of producing a film under terms and conditions established by the director. The economic and other benefits to this state of film production located in this state shall be are considered to be the value received by this state in exchange for the use of property under this section. (2) The director or the commission shall not authorize the use of property owned by or under the control of the department for the production of a film that includes obscene matter or an obscene performance or for a production for which records are required to be maintained with respect to any performer under 18 USC 2257. (3) The department shall cooperate with the Michigan film office in providing the office with information about potential film locations owned by or under the control of the department and the use of property owned by or under the control of the department. (3) (4) As used in this section: (a) "Film" means single media or multimedia entertainment content for distribution or exhibition to the general public by any means and media in any digital media format, film, or videotape, including, but not limited to, a motion picture, a documentary, a television series, a television miniseries, a television special, interstitial television programming, long-form television, interactive television, music videos, interactive games, video games, commercials, internet programming, an internet video, a sound recording, a video, digital animation, or an interactive website. (b) "Michigan film office" means the Michigan film office created in section 29a of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2029a. (b) (c) "Obscene matter or an obscene performance" means matter described in 1984 PA 343, MCL 752.361 to 752.374. Sec. 11550. (1) The solid waste management fund is created within the state treasury. The state treasurer may receive money from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. The department shall be the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (2) Money in the solid waste management fund at the close of the fiscal year shall remain remains in the fund and shall does not lapse to the general fund. (3) The state treasurer shall establish, within the solid waste management fund, a solid waste staff account and a perpetual care account. (4) Subject to subsection (5), money shall be expended from the solid waste staff account, upon on appropriation, only for the following purposes: (a) Preparing generally applicable guidance regarding the materials management facility program or its implementation or enforcement. (b) Reviewing and acting on any notification, registration, application for approval under a general permit, application for a permit or license, permit or license revision, or permit or license renewal under part 115, including the cost of public notice and public hearings. (c) Providing an advisory analysis under section 11510(1). (d) General administrative costs of running the permit, license, registration, and notification program under part 115, including permit, license, registration, and notification tracking and data entry. (e) Inspection of materials management facilities and open dumps. (f) Implementing and enforcing the conditions of any permit, license, approval under a general permit, registration, or order under part 115. (g) Groundwater monitoring audits at disposal areas that are or have been licensed under this part or at any other materials management facility that requires groundwater monitoring because of a release or suspected release. (h) Reviewing and acting upon corrective action plans for materials management facilities, if required under part 115. (i) Review of certifications of closure under part 115. (j) Postclosure maintenance and monitoring inspections and review under part 115. (k) Review of bonds and financial assurance documentation at materials management facilities, if required under part 115. (l) Materials management planning. (m) Materials utilization education and outreach. (n) Development of a materials utilization and recycled materials market directory. (o) Administration of grants and loans under part 115 for planning, market development and recycling infrastructure, outreach, and education. (p) Up to 1 full-time equivalent employee for the Michigan economic development corporation bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act to address recycled materials market development. (5) Money shall be expended from the perpetual care account, upon on appropriation, only for the following activities at materials management facilities for which the requirements of section 11508(1)(a) are or were met and for which fees have been collected and deposited into the perpetual care account: (a) To conduct postclosure maintenance and monitoring if the owner or operator is no longer required to do so. (b) To conduct closure, postclosure maintenance and monitoring, and necessary corrective action if the owner or operator has failed to do so. Money shall be expended from the account only after funds from any other financial assurance mechanisms held by the owner or operator have been expended and the department has made reasonable efforts to obtain funding from other sources. (6) Subject to appropriations, the department shall provide grants for the following purposes: (a) The recycling markets program established under subsection (7). (b) The local recycling innovation program established under subsection (8). (c) The recycling access and voluntary participation program established under subsection (9). (7) The department shall establish a recycling markets program. The program shall must provide grants or loans for acquiring equipment or technology, for research and development, or for associated activities to provide for new or increased use of recycled materials or to support the development of recycling markets. Local units of government and nonprofit and for-profit entities are eligible for funding under the program. The funding is not limited to entities in counties with approved materials management plans. In addition to any other reporting requirements established by the department, grant recipients under the program shall provide the department information on the materials managed. (8) The department shall establish a local recycling innovation program. The program shall must provide grants or loans for developing local recycling infrastructure, for recycling education campaigns for residents and businesses, technology, or other activities that result in increasing recycling access, quality, or participation, for reducing waste, or for sustainable materials management. Local units of government and nonprofit and for-profit entities are eligible for funding under the program. The funding is not limited to entities in counties with approved materials management plans. In addition to any other reporting requirements established by the department, grant recipients under the program shall provide the department information on the materials managed. (9) The department shall establish a recycling access and voluntary participation program. The program shall must provide grants or loans to assist local units of government in implementing best materials utilization practices or identifying ways to innovate and to collaborate with other local units and the private sector. To be eligible for a grant, a local unit of government must be a county that meets, or a municipality located within a county that meets, both of the following requirements: (a) Has a materials management plan. (b) Has documented progress toward meeting or has met its benchmark recycling standards and ultimately the municipal solid waste recycling rate goal under section 11507. (10) The department shall publish and make available to grant and loan applicants criteria upon on which the grants and loans will be made. (11) By March 1 annually, the department shall prepare and submit to the governor, the legislature, the chairs of the standing committees of the senate and house of representatives with primary responsibility for issues related to natural resources and the environment, and the chairs of the subcommittees of the senate and house appropriations committees with primary responsibility for appropriations to the department a report that details the activities of the previous fiscal year funded by the staff account of the solid waste management fund. This report shall must include, at a minimum, all of the following as they apply to the department: (a) The number of full-time equated positions performing solid waste management authorization, compliance, and enforcement activities. (b) All of the following information related to the construction permit applications received under section 11509: (i) The number of applications received by the department, reported as the number of applications determined to be administratively incomplete and the number determined to be administratively complete. (ii) The number of applications determined to be administratively complete for which a final action was taken by the department. The number of final actions shall must be reported as the number of applications approved, the number of applications denied, and the number of applications withdrawn by the applicant. (iii) The percentage and number of applications determined to be administratively complete for which a final decision was made within the period required by part 13. (c) All of the following information related to the operating license applications received under section 11512: (i) The number of applications received by the department, reported as the number of applications determined to be administratively incomplete and the number determined to be administratively complete. (ii) The number of applications determined to be administratively complete for which a final action was taken by the department. The number of final actions shall be reported as the number of applications approved, the number of applications denied, and the number of applications withdrawn by the applicant. (iii) The percentage and number of applications determined to be administratively complete for which a final decision was made within the period required by part 13. (d) The number of inspections conducted at licensed disposal areas as required by section 11519 and the number of inspections conducted at materials utilization facilities as required by section 11526. (e) The number of letters of warning sent to licensed disposal areas. (f) The number of contested case hearings and civil actions initiated and completed, the number of voluntary consent orders and administrative orders entered or issued, and the amount of fines and penalties collected through such actions or orders. (g) For each enforcement action that includes a penalty, a description of the corrective actions required by the enforcement action. (h) The number of solid waste complaints received, investigated, resolved, and not resolved by the department. (i) The amount of revenue in the staff account of the solid waste management fund and the amount of revenue in the coal ash care fund at the end of the fiscal year. (12) The coal ash care fund is created within the state treasury. The state treasurer may receive money from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (13) Money shall be expended from the coal ash care fund, upon on appropriation, only for the following purposes relating to coal ash impoundments and coal ash landfills: (a) Preparing generally applicable guidance regarding the solid waste permit and license program or its implementation or enforcement. (b) Reviewing and acting on any application for a permit or license, permit or license revision, or permit or license renewal, including the cost of public notice and public hearings. (c) Performing an advisory analysis under section 11510(1). (d) General administrative costs of running the permit and license program, including permit and license tracking and data entry. (e) Inspection of licensed disposal areas and open dumps. (f) Implementing and enforcing the conditions of any permit or license. (g) Groundwater monitoring audits at disposal areas that are or have been licensed under this part. (h) Reviewing and acting upon corrective action plans for disposal areas that are or have been licensed under this part. (i) Review of certifications of closure. (j) Postclosure maintenance and monitoring inspections and review. (k) Review of bonds and financial assurance documentation at disposal areas that are or have been licensed under this part. Sec. 20104a. (1) The brownfield redevelopment board is created within the department. (2) The board shall consist consists of the following members: (a) The director or his or her designee. (b) The director of the department of technology, management, and budget or his or her designee. (c) The chief executive officer director of the Michigan economic development corporation bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act or his or her designee. (3) A majority of the members of the board constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at a meeting of the board. (4) The business which the board may perform shall must be conducted at a public meeting of the board held in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (5) A writing prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, or retained by the board in the performance of an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (6) The board shall implement the duties and responsibilities as provided in this part and as otherwise provided by law. Sec. 72103. (1) The director may designate a trail in this state located on land as a "Pure Michigan Trail". A person may request that the director designate a trail as a Pure Michigan Trail. The director shall not designate a trail as a Pure Michigan Trail unless it meets, or will meet when completed, all of the following requirements: (a) The trail is a model trail for its designated uses and the designation of the trail as a Pure Michigan Trail contributes to a statewide trail network that promotes healthy lifestyles, economic development, recreation, and conservation of the natural and cultural resources of this state. (b) The land on which the trail is located is owned by this state or a governmental agency or otherwise is under the long-term control of this state or a governmental agency through a lease, easement, or other arrangement. If the land is owned by a governmental agency, the director shall obtain the consent of the governmental agency before designating the land as part of a Pure Michigan Trail. (c) The design and maintenance of the trail and its related facilities meet generally accepted standards of public safety. (d) The trail meets appropriate standards for its designated recreation uses. (e) The trail is available for designated recreation uses on a nondiscriminatory basis. (f) The trail is, or has potential to be, a segment of a statewide network of trails, or it attracts a substantial share of its users from beyond the local area. (g) The trail is marked with an official Pure Michigan Trail sign and logo at major access points. (h) Where feasible, the trail offers adequate support facilities for the public, including parking, sanitary facilities, and emergency telephones, that are accessible to people with disabilities and are at reasonable frequency along the trail. The trail may include amenities related to trail usage such as connectors and access to rest areas, lodging, and eating facilities, as well as park benches and signage. Support facilities and trail amenities described in this subdivision are public goods. (i) Potential negative impacts of trail development on owners or residents of adjacent property are minimized through all of the following: (i) Adequate enforcement of trail rules and regulations. (ii) Continuation of access for trail crossings for agricultural and other purposes. (iii) Construction and maintenance of fencing, where necessary, by the owner or operator of the trail. (iv) Other means as considered appropriate by the director. (j) A trademark license is obtained by the department from the Michigan economic development corporation bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act for use of the words "Pure Michigan". (k) Other conditions required by the director. (2) In designating trails as Pure Michigan Trails under subsection (1), the director shall consider all forms of permissible recreation uses equally in order to develop a Pure Michigan Trails network that is representative of the various trail uses. (3) The director may designate a water trail as a "Pure Michigan Water Trail". A person may request that the director designate a trail as a Pure Michigan Water Trail. The director shall not designate a trail as a Pure Michigan Water Trail unless it meets, or will meet when completed, all of the following requirements: (a) The trail and its access points are open to public use and are designed, constructed, and maintained according to best management practices. (b) The trail is located on a contiguous waterway or a series of waterways that are contiguous or are connected by portages. (c) The trail is consistent with applicable land use plans and environmental laws. (d) The trail meets the criteria of subsection (1)(a), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), (h), (i)(i) and (iv), and (k). (e) A trademark license is obtained by the department from the Michigan economic development corporation bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act for use of the words "Pure Michigan". (4) Prior to designating a Pure Michigan Trail under subsection (1) or a Pure Michigan Water Trail under subsection (3), the director shall refer the proposed designation to the natural resources commission, which shall hold a public hearing on the proposed designation. Within Not later than 90 days after receiving the referral under this subsection, the natural resources commission shall provide the director with its recommendation regarding the designation. (5) The director may revoke a Pure Michigan Trail or a Pure Michigan Water Trail designation if he or she determines that a trail fails to meet the requirements of this section. Before revoking a Pure Michigan Trail or a Pure Michigan Water Trail designation, the director shall provide notice to all entities involved in the management of the trail. If the trail is brought into compliance with this section within 90 days after providing this notice, the director shall not revoke the designation. Sec. 72104. (1) The director, upon on petition by a person, may designate a city, village, or township as a "Pure Michigan Trail Town" if the director determines that the following conditions have been met: (a) The city, village, or township is easily accessible to users of a Pure Michigan Trail or a Pure Michigan Water Trail. (b) The city, village, or township has adopted a resolution in support of the designation. (c) The city, village, or township has adopted a plan for providing support services to trail users such as parking, sanitary facilities, restaurants, accommodations, grocery stores, bike shops, boat docks, or other services that may be needed or desired by trail users. (d) The petitioner demonstrates at least 3 of the following: (i) There is community support for the designation as evidenced by creation of an advisory committee. (ii) There has been an annual trail-related project or event within the city, village, or township. (iii) A school board within the city, village, or township has endorsed a trail-based service learning educational component within its schools. (iv) Land use plans, planning tools, ordinances, or guidelines are in place that recognize the relationship between the trail and other community assets, or that there is support to amend, change, or add these provisions. (e) A trademark license is obtained by the department from the Michigan economic development corporation bureau of fair competition and free enterprise created in section 7 of the economic development fair competition and free enterprise act for use of the words "Pure Michigan". (2) Upon On designation of a city, village, or township as a Pure Michigan Trail Town, the city, village, or township may erect and maintain along the Pure Michigan Trail or Pure Michigan Water Trail at a junction with the city, village, or township an official Pure Michigan Trail Town sign and logo designed by the department. The department shall only provide for the erection and maintenance of an official Pure Michigan Trail Town sign and logo when sufficient private contributions are received to pay for the cost of erecting and maintaining the sign and logo. (3) The director may revoke a Pure Michigan Trail Town designation if he or she determines that the city, village, or township has failed to meet the requirements of this section. Before revoking a Pure Michigan Trail Town designation, the director shall provide notice to the city, village, or township. If the city, village, or township is brought into compliance with this section within 90 days after providing this notice, the director shall not revoke the designation. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 631 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.